test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_apina_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:
  
  Noun - rapu: # ok APINA
    rapu+N+Sg+Nom:  rapu
    rapu+N+Sg+Gen:  rapu
    rapu+N+Sg+Acc:  rapu
    rapu+N+Sg+Ill:  rapun
    rapu+N+Sg+Loc:  rapust
    rapu+N+Sg+Com:  rapuin
    rapu+N+Sg+Abe:  raputtáá
    rapu+N+Ess:  rapun
    rapu+N+Par:  rapud
    rapu+N+Pl+Nom:  rapuh
    rapu+N+Pl+Gen:  rapui
    rapu+N+Pl+Acc:  rapuid
    rapu+N+Pl+Ill:  rapuid
    rapu+N+Pl+Loc:  rapuin
    rapu+N+Pl+Com:  rapuiguin
    rapu+N+Pl+Abe:  rapuittáá

  Noun - kaasu: # ok APINA
    kaasu+N+Sg+Nom:  kaasu
    kaasu+N+Sg+Gen:  kaasu
    kaasu+N+Sg+Acc:  kaasu
    kaasu+N+Sg+Ill:  kaasun
    kaasu+N+Sg+Loc:  kaasust
    kaasu+N+Sg+Com:  kaasuin
    kaasu+N+Sg+Abe:  kaasuttáá
    kaasu+N+Ess:  kaasun
    kaasu+N+Par:  kaasud
    kaasu+N+Pl+Nom:  kaasuh
    kaasu+N+Pl+Gen:  kaasui
    kaasu+N+Pl+Acc:  kaasuid
    kaasu+N+Pl+Ill:  kaasuid
    kaasu+N+Pl+Loc:  kaasuin
    kaasu+N+Pl+Com:  kaasuiguin
    kaasu+N+Pl+Abe:  kaasuittáá

  Noun - liidu: # ok APINA
    liidu+N+Sg+Nom:  liidu
    liidu+N+Sg+Gen:  liidu
    liidu+N+Sg+Acc:  liidu
    liidu+N+Sg+Ill:  liidun
    liidu+N+Sg+Loc:  liidust
    liidu+N+Sg+Com:  liiduin
    liidu+N+Sg+Abe:  liiduttáá
    liidu+N+Ess:  liidun
    liidu+N+Par:  liidud
    liidu+N+Pl+Nom:  liiduh
    liidu+N+Pl+Gen:  liidui
    liidu+N+Pl+Acc:  liiduid
    liidu+N+Pl+Ill:  liiduid
    liidu+N+Pl+Loc:  liiduin
    liidu+N+Pl+Com:  liiduiguin
    liidu+N+Pl+Abe:  liiduittáá

  Noun - ruusu: # ok APINA
    ruusu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruusu
    ruusu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruusu
    ruusu+N+Sg+Acc:  ruusu
    ruusu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruusun
    ruusu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruusust
    ruusu+N+Sg+Com:  ruusuin
    ruusu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruusuttáá
    ruusu+N+Ess:  ruusun
    ruusu+N+Par:  ruusud
    ruusu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruusuh
    ruusu+N+Pl+Gen:  ruusui
    ruusu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruusuid
    ruusu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruusuid
    ruusu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruusuin
    ruusu+N+Pl+Com:  ruusuiguin
    ruusu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruusuittáá

  Noun - hana: # - ok
    hana+N+Sg+Nom:  hana
    hana+N+Sg+Gen:  hana
    hana+N+Sg+Ill:  hanan
    hana+N+Sg+Loc:  hanast
    hana+N+Sg+Com:  hanain
    hana+N+Sg+Abe:  hanattáá
    hana+N+Ess:  hanan
    hana+N+Pl+Nom:  hanah
    hana+N+Pl+Gen:  hanai
    hana+N+Pl+Acc:  hanaid
    hana+N+Pl+Ill:  hanaid
    hana+N+Pl+Loc:  hanain
    hana+N+Pl+Com:  hanaiguin
    hana+N+Pl+Abe:  hanaittáá


  Noun - laava: # - ok
    laava+N+Sg+Nom:  laava
    laava+N+Sg+Gen:  laava
    laava+N+Sg+Ill:  laavan
    laava+N+Sg+Loc:  laavast
    laava+N+Sg+Com:  laavain
    laava+N+Sg+Abe:  laavattáá
    laava+N+Ess:  laavan
    laava+N+Par:  laavad
    laava+N+Pl+Nom:  laavah
    laava+N+Pl+Gen:  laavai
    laava+N+Pl+Acc:  laavaid
    laava+N+Pl+Ill:  laavaid
    laava+N+Pl+Loc:  laavain
    laava+N+Pl+Com:  laavaiguin
    laava+N+Pl+Abe:  laavaittáá

  Noun - sooda: # - ok
    sooda+N+Sg+Nom:  sooda
    sooda+N+Sg+Gen:  sooda
    sooda+N+Sg+Ill:  soodan
    sooda+N+Sg+Loc:  soodast
    sooda+N+Sg+Com:  soodain
    sooda+N+Sg+Abe:  soodattáá
    sooda+N+Ess:  soodan
    sooda+N+Par:  soodad
    sooda+N+Pl+Nom:  soodah
    sooda+N+Pl+Gen:  soodai
    sooda+N+Pl+Acc:  soodaid
    sooda+N+Pl+Ill:  soodaid
    sooda+N+Pl+Loc:  soodain
    sooda+N+Pl+Com:  soodaiguin
    sooda+N+Pl+Abe:  soodaittáá


  Noun - loová:
    loová+N+Sg+Nom:  loová # Ij uánánem
    loová+N+Sg+Gen:  loová
    loová+N+Sg+Acc:  loová
    loová+N+Sg+Ill:  loován
    loová+N+Sg+Loc:  loovást
    loová+N+Sg+Com:  loováin
    loová+N+Sg+Abe:  loováttáá
    loová+N+Ess:  loován
    loová+N+Par:  loovád
    loová+N+Pl+Nom:  loováh
    loová+N+Pl+Gen:  loovái
    loová+N+Pl+Acc:  loováid
    loová+N+Pl+Ill:  loováid
    loová+N+Pl+Loc:  loováin
    loová+N+Pl+Com:  loováiguin
    loová+N+Pl+Abe:  loováittáá

  Noun - juná:
    juná+N+Sg+Nom:  juná
    juná+N+Sg+Gen:  juná
    juná+N+Sg+Acc:  juná
    juná+N+Sg+Ill:  junán
    juná+N+Sg+Loc:  junást
    juná+N+Sg+Com:  junáin
    juná+N+Sg+Abe:  junáttáá
    juná+N+Ess:  junán
    juná+N+Par:  junád
    juná+N+Pl+Nom:  junáh
    juná+N+Pl+Gen:  junái
    juná+N+Pl+Acc:  junáid
    juná+N+Pl+Ill:  junáid
    juná+N+Pl+Loc:  junáin
    juná+N+Pl+Com:  junáiguin
    juná+N+Pl+Abe:  junáittáá

  Noun - hágá:
    hágá+N+Sg+Nom:  hágá
    hágá+N+Sg+Gen:  hágá
    hágá+N+Sg+Acc:  hágá
    hágá+N+Sg+Ill:  hágán
    hágá+N+Sg+Loc:  hágást
    hágá+N+Sg+Com:  hágáin
    hágá+N+Sg+Abe:  hágáttáá
    hágá+N+Ess:  hágán
    hágá+N+Par:  hágád
    hágá+N+Pl+Nom:  hágáh
    hágá+N+Pl+Gen:  hágái
    hágá+N+Pl+Acc:  hágáid
    hágá+N+Pl+Ill:  hágáid
    hágá+N+Pl+Loc:  hágáin
    hágá+N+Pl+Com:  hágáiguin
    hágá+N+Pl+Abe:  hágáittáá

  Noun - taŋgo:  # ok APINA
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Nom:  taŋgo
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Gen:  taŋgo
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Acc:  taŋgo
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Ill:  taŋgon
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Loc:  taŋgost
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Com:  taŋgoin
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Abe:  taŋgottáá
    taŋgo+N+Ess:  taŋgon
    taŋgo+N+Par:  taŋgod
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Nom:  taŋgoh
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Gen:  taŋgoi
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Acc:  taŋgoid
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Ill:  taŋgoid
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Loc:  taŋgoin
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Com:  taŋgoiguin
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Abe:  taŋgoittáá

  Noun - piano:
    piano+N+Sg+Nom:  piano
    piano+N+Sg+Gen:  piano
    piano+N+Sg+Acc:  piano
    piano+N+Sg+Ill:  pianon
    piano+N+Sg+Loc:  pianost
    piano+N+Sg+Com:  pianoin
    piano+N+Sg+Abe:  pianottáá
    piano+N+Ess:  pianon
    piano+N+Par:  pianod
    piano+N+Pl+Nom:  pianoh
    piano+N+Pl+Gen:  pianoi
    piano+N+Pl+Acc:  pianoid
    piano+N+Pl+Ill:  pianoid
    piano+N+Pl+Loc:  pianoin
    piano+N+Pl+Com:  pianoiguin
    piano+N+Pl+Abe:  pianoittáá

  Noun - euro:
    euro+N+Sg+Nom:  euro
    euro+N+Sg+Gen:  euro
    euro+N+Sg+Acc:  euro
    euro+N+Sg+Ill:  euron
    euro+N+Sg+Loc:  eurost
    euro+N+Sg+Com:  euroin
    euro+N+Sg+Abe:  eurottáá
    euro+N+Ess:  euron
    euro+N+Pl+Nom:  euroh
    euro+N+Pl+Gen:  euroi
    euro+N+Pl+Acc:  euroid
    euro+N+Pl+Ill:  euroid
    euro+N+Pl+Loc:  euroin
    euro+N+Pl+Com:  euroiguin
    euro+N+Pl+Abe:  euroittáá

  Noun - poorá: # Removed from saaha to apina
    poorá+N+Sg+Nom:  poorá
    poorá+N+Sg+Gen:  poorá
    poorá+N+Sg+Acc:  poorá
    poorá+N+Sg+Ill:  poorán
    poorá+N+Sg+Loc:  poorást
    poorá+N+Sg+Com:  pooráin
    poorá+N+Sg+Abe:  pooráttáá
    poorá+N+Ess:  poorán
    poorá+N+Par:  poorád
    poorá+N+Pl+Nom:  pooráh
    poorá+N+Pl+Gen:  poorái
    poorá+N+Pl+Acc:  pooráid
    poorá+N+Pl+Ill:  pooráid
    poorá+N+Pl+Loc:  pooráin
    poorá+N+Pl+Com:  pooráiguin
    poorá+N+Pl+Abe:  pooráittáá

  Noun - viini: # ok VIINI
    viini+N+Sg+Nom:   viini
    viini+N+Sg+Gen:   viini
    viini+N+Sg+Ill:   viinin
    viini+N+Sg+Loc:   viinist
    viini+N+Sg+Com:   viinijn
    viini+N+Sg+Abe:   viinittáá
    viini+N+Ess:      viinin
    viini+N+Par:      viinid
    viini+N+Pl+Nom:   viinih
    viini+N+Pl+Gen:   viinij
    viini+N+Pl+Acc:   viinijd
    viini+N+Pl+Ill:   viinijd
    viini+N+Pl+Loc:   viinijn
    viini+N+Pl+Com:   viinijguin
    viini+N+Pl+Abe:   viinijttáá

  Noun - riisi: # ok VIINI
    riisi+N+Sg+Nom:   riisi
    riisi+N+Sg+Gen:   riisi
    riisi+N+Sg+Ill:   riisin
    riisi+N+Sg+Loc:   riisist
    riisi+N+Sg+Com:   riisijn
    riisi+N+Sg+Abe:   riisittáá
    riisi+N+Ess:      riisin
    riisi+N+Par:      riisid
    riisi+N+Pl+Nom:   riisih
    riisi+N+Pl+Gen:   riisij
    riisi+N+Pl+Acc:   riisijd
    riisi+N+Pl+Ill:   riisijd
    riisi+N+Pl+Loc:   riisijn
    riisi+N+Pl+Com:   riisijguin
    riisi+N+Pl+Abe:   riisijttáá


  Noun - koori: # ok fuom Sg Abe, Pl Gen oˊ ?
    koori+N+Sg+Nom:   koori
    koori+N+Sg+Gen:   koori
    koori+N+Sg+Acc:   koori
    koori+N+Sg+Ill:   koorin
    koori+N+Sg+Loc:   koorist
    koori+N+Sg+Com:   koorijn
    koori+N+Sg+Abe:   koorittáá
    koori+N+Ess:      koorin
    koori+N+Par:      koorid
    koori+N+Pl+Nom:   koorih
    koori+N+Pl+Gen:   koorij
    koori+N+Pl+Acc:   koorijd
    koori+N+Pl+Ill:   koorijd
    koori+N+Pl+Loc:   koorijn
    koori+N+Pl+Com:   koorijguin
    koori+N+Pl+Abe:   koorijttáá
